Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1200.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Apples are grown in all 67 counties within this Commonwealth.(2) Pennsylvania is the country's fourth largest producer of fresh apples and processed apple products.(3) According to the 2022 Agricultural Census, there are more than 25,000 acres of apple orchards in this Commonwealth.(4) According to the Pennsylvania Department of Agriculture, for the last 10 years, the average amount of apples harvested for production in this Commonwealth is between 400 million and 600 million pounds.(5) There are many varieties of apples found across this 123456789101112131415161718 Commonwealth. The specific apple varieties that originated in Pennsylvania are:(i) Nittany, which was developed in 1979, named after The Pennsylvania State University mascot.(ii) Smokehouse, which originated in Millcreek in 1837 and is now widely grown in Lancaster County.(iii) Jefferies, which originated in Chester County in 1830.(iv) York Imperial, which was developed in York County in the 1820s.Section 2. Official designation.The apple is selected, designated and adopted as the official fruit of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1200PN1473 - 2 - 123456789101112131415